src/import/adverbs.lexc
LEXICON Adverbs

 CompoundingAdverbs ;
 @P.Part.Bad@ PlainAdverbs ;


LEXICON CompoundingAdverbs

 @P.Stem.topelt@ NounCompoundingAdverbs ;
 VerbCompoundingAdverbs ;


LEXICON NounCompoundingAdverbs

järel+Adv:järel GI ;
koos+Adv:k´oos GI ;
kõrval+Adv:kõrval GI ;
otse+Adv:otse GI ;
püsti+Adv:p´üs,ti GI ;
ratsa+Adv:r´atsa GI ;
taga+Adv:taga GI ;
topelt+Adv:topelt GI ;
vastas+Adv:vastas GI ;
vastu+Adv:v´astu GI ;
üle+Adv:üle GI ;
